Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
25-15-502. Definition.

As used in this section, “rule impacting state Medicaid costs” means a proposed rule as defined by § 25-15-202(9), or a proposed amendment to an existing rule as defined by § 25-15-202(9), that would, if adopted, adjust Medicaid reimbursement rates, Medicaid eligibility criteria, or Medicaid benefits, including without limitation a proposed rule or a proposed amendment to an existing rule seeking to:

Reduce the number of individuals covered by the Arkansas Medicaid Program;

Limit the types of services covered by the program;

Reduce the utilization of services covered by the program;

Reduce provider reimbursement;

Increase consumer cost sharing;

Reduce the cost of administering the program;

Increase the program revenues;

Reduce fraud and abuse in the program;

Change any of the methodologies used for reimbursement of providers;

Seek a new waiver or modification of an existing waiver of any provision under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396-1 et seq., including a waiver that would allow a demonstration project;

Participate or seek to participate in the waiver authority of Section 1115(a)(1) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1315(a)(1), that would allow operation of a demonstration project or program;

Participate or seek to participate in a request under Section 1115(a)(2) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1315(a)(2), for the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services to provide federal financial participation for costs associated with a demonstration project or program;

Implement managed care provisions under Section 1932 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396u-2; or

Participate or seek to participate in the projects or programs of the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Innovation.

“Rule impacting state Medicaid costs” does not include a modification, addition, or elimination of the medical codes used within the Arkansas Medicaid Program that are issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including without limitation:

Current Procedural Terminology codes;

Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes;

International Classification of Diseases codes;

National Uniform Billing Committee Official UB-04 Data Specifications Manual codes; and

National Correct Coding Initiative codes.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and

The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

A review of the emergency rule by the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall occur within forty-five (45) days of the date that the emergency rule is provided to the chairs.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 494, § 6: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted Feb. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that Amendment 70 of the Constitution of Arkansas provides that salaries of the Executive Department officials may be increased annually by an amount not to exceed the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as published by the United States Department of Labor, for the two years immediately preceding the year of the salary appropriation; that this act establishes the proper salaries for the Executive Department; that the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 1175, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-first General Assembly, that Amendment 70 of the Constitution of Arkansas provides that salaries of the Executive and Legislative Department officials may be increased annually by an amount not to exceed the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as published by the United States Department of Labor, for the two years immediately preceding the year of the salary appropriation; that this act establishes the proper salaries for the Executive and Legislative Departments; that the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-Second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 3, § 13: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the salaries of executive department elected officials, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 3, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1175 § 5.

Publisher's Notes. This section concerning Salaries of Executive Department elected officials was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 15. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 494, § 1.

This section was formerly codified as §25-16-101. Former §25-16-102 is now codified as §25-16-101.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 605, §
3.

25-15-503. Additional rule procedure.

(1)In addition to filing requirements under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., and §10-3-309, the Department of Human Services shall, at least thirty (30) days before the expiration of the period for public comment, file a proposed rule impacting state Medicaid costs or a proposed amendment to an existing rule impacting state Medicaid costs with the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

A review of the proposed rule or proposed amendment to an existing rule by the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall occur within forty-five (45) days of the date the proposed rule or proposed amendment to an existing rule is filed with the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

(1)If adopting an emergency rule impacting state Medicaid costs, in addition to the filing requirements under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., and §10-3-309, the department shall notify the following individuals of the emergency rule and provide each individual with a copy of the rule within five (5) business days of adopting the rule:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 605, §
3.

Subchapter 4

— Rule Report, Sunset, and Extension